Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.100

Basic education certificated instructional staff—Definition—Ratio to students.

(1) For the purposes of this section and RCW 28A.150.410 and 28A.400.200, "basic education certificated instructional staff" means all full-time equivalent classroom teachers, teacher-librarians, counselors, certificated student health services staff, and other certificated instructional staff in the following programs as defined for statewide school district accounting purposes: Basic education, secondary vocational education, general instructional support, and general supportive services.

(2) Each school district shall maintain a ratio of at least 46 basic education certificated instructional staff to 1,000 annual average full-time equivalent students. This requirement does not apply to that portion of a district's annual average full-time equivalent enrollment that is enrolled in alternative learning experience courses as defined in RCW 28A.232.010.

[ 2022 c 109 s 6; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 512; 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 10; 2010 c 236 s 13; 1990 c 33 s 103; 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 203. Formerly RCW 28A.41.110.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 109 ss 3, 6, and 7: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Intent—2022 c 109: See note following RCW 28A.300.476.

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 34 ss 9 and 10: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 34: See RCW 28A.232.005.

Effective date—2010 c 236 ss 2, 3, 4, 8, 10, 13, and 14: See note following RCW 28A.150.260.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1987 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 84.52.0531.